Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Municipal Property Tax.
Sec. 29.45.060.
Farm or agricultural land.

Farm use land included in a farm unit and not dedicated or being used for nonfarm purposes shall be assessed on the basis of full and true value for farm use and may not be assessed as if subdivided or used for some other nonfarm purpose. The assessor shall maintain records valuing the land for both full and true value and farm use value. If the land is sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of for uses incompatible with farm use or converted to a use incompatible with farm use by the owner, the owner is liable to pay an amount equal to the additional tax at the current mill levy together with eight percent interest for the preceding seven years, as though the land had not been assessed for farm use purposes. Payment by the owner shall be made to the state to the extent of its reimbursement for revenue loss under (d) of this section for the preceding seven years. The balance of the payment shall be made to the municipality.

An owner of farm use land shall, to secure the assessment under this section, apply to the assessor before May 15 of each year in which the assessment is desired. The application shall be made upon forms prescribed by the state assessor for the use of the local assessor, and must include information that may reasonably be required to determine the entitlement of the applicant. If the land is leased for farm use purposes, the applicant shall furnish to the assessor a copy of the lease bearing the signatures of both lessee and lessor along with the completed application. The applicant shall furnish the assessor a copy of the lease covering the period for which the exemption is requested. This subsection does not apply to a person with an interest in land that is classified by the state for agricultural use or that is restricted by the state for agricultural purposes.

In the event of a crop failure by an act of God the previous year, the owner or lessee may submit an affidavit affirming that 10 percent of gross income for the past three years was from farming.

Subject to legislative appropriations for the purpose, the state shall reimburse a borough or city, as appropriate, for the property tax revenues lost to it by the operation of this section.

All land that is classified by the state for agricultural use or that is restricted by the state for agricultural purposes shall be assessed on the basis of full and true value based upon that restricted use.

This section does not apply to land for which the owner has granted, and has outstanding, a lease or option to buy the surface rights. A property owner wishing to file for farm use classification having no history of farm-related income may submit a declaration of intent at the time of filing the application with the assessor setting out the intended use of the land and the anticipated percentage of income. An applicant using this procedure shall file with the assessor before February 1 of the following year a notarized statement of the percentage of gross income attributable to the land. Failure to make the filing required in this subsection forfeits the exemption.

In this section, “farm use” means the use of land for profit for raising and harvesting crops, for the feeding, breeding, and management of livestock, for dairying, or another agricultural use, or any combination of these. To be farm use land, the owner or lessee must be actively engaged in farming the land, and derive at least 10 percent of yearly gross income from the land.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 117 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (f) and relettered in 2002, at which time (e) was relettered as (f). Subsection (f) was also formerly (c) and was relettered in 1992, at which time what had been (d) and (e) were relettered as (c) and (d), respectively. Subsection (g) was formerly the first two sentences of subsection (f) and was redesignated as (g) in 2008.

Administrative Code. —

For farm and agricultural land, see 3 AAC 138.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Commercial greenhouses should be considered a farm use of property for taxation purposes under this section. April 2, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.45.062.
Land subject to a conservation easement.

Land that is subject to a conservation easement created under AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

and used consistent with the conservation easement shall be assessed on the basis of full and true value for use subject to the conservation easement and may not be assessed as though it was not subject to the conservation easement. The assessor shall maintain records valuing the land for both full and true value and value subject to the conservation easement. The municipality may, by ordinance, require that if the land is sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of for uses incompatible with the conservation easement or if the conservation easement is conveyed to the owner of the property, the owner shall pay to the municipality an amount equal to the additional tax at the current mill levy together with eight percent interest for the preceding 10 years, as though the land had not been assessed subject to the conservation easement.

To secure the assessment under this section, an owner of land subject to a conservation easement shall apply to the assessor before May 15 of each year in which the assessment is desired. The application must be made upon forms prescribed by the assessor and must include information that may reasonably be required to determine the entitlement of the applicant.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, under § 5, ch. 116, SLA 2008 “AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Sec. 29.45.065.
Assessment of private airports open for public use.

A municipality may provide by ordinance that airports located on private land and open and available for public use may be assessed at full and true value for airport use and not as if subdivided or used for some other nonairport use. The assessor shall maintain records valuing the land at both full and true value and airport use value. If the land is sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of for uses incompatible with airport use by the public or if the owner converts the land to a use incompatible with airport use by the public, the owner is liable to pay an amount equal to the additional tax at the current mill levy together with eight percent interest from the time of the incompatibility, as if the land had not been assessed for airport use. Payment of the additional tax and interest shall be made to the municipality.

To secure the assessment under this section, the owner of the airport shall show that the airport is on private land, is open and available for public use, and is of benefit to the public or municipality. The owner shall apply to the assessor before May 15 of each year that the assessment is desired on forms to be prescribed by the municipality for use of the local assessor and shall include information reasonably required to determine the entitlement of the applicant. If the land is leased for airport purposes, the applicant shall furnish the assessor with a copy of the lease bearing the signature of both the lessee and lessor for the period that the exemption is requested.

In this section, “airport” means an area of land or water that is used for the landing, takeoff, movement, or parking of aircraft, and the appurtenant areas that are used for airport buildings or other airport facilities or right-of-way, together with airport buildings and facilities at the location.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 1987)

Sec. 29.45.070.
Mobile homes.

Mobile homes, trailers, house trailers, trailer coaches, and similar property used or intended to be used for residential, office, or commercial purposes and permanently affixed to real property under AS

34.85.150

are classified as real property for tax purposes unless expressly classified as personal property by ordinance. This section does not apply to house trailers and mobile homes that are unoccupied and held for sale by persons engaged in the business of selling mobile homes. In this section, “mobile home” has the meaning given to “manufactured home” in AS

45.29.102

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 23 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in the first sentence substituted “permanently affixed to real property under AS

34.85.150

” for “attached to the land or connected to water, gas, electric, or sewage facilities”; added the last sentence.

Sec. 29.45.080.
Tax on oil and gas production and pipeline property.

A municipality may levy and collect taxes on taxable property taxable under AS 43.56 only by using one of the methods set out in (b) or (c) of this section.

A municipality may levy and collect a tax on the full and true value of taxable property taxable under AS 43.56 as valued by the Department of Revenue at a rate not to exceed that which produces an amount of revenue from the total municipal property tax equivalent to $1,500 a year for each person residing in its boundaries.

A municipality may levy and collect a tax on the full and true value of that portion of taxable property taxable under AS 43.56 as assessed by the Department of Revenue which value, when combined with the value of property otherwise taxable by the municipality, does not exceed the product of the percentage determined in (f) of this section of the average per capita assessed full and true value of property in the state multiplied by the number of residents of the taxing municipality.

Each assessment year, a taxing municipality shall inform the Department of Revenue, by

February 1, which method of taxation the municipality will use; and

May 1, the

total value of the municipality’s locally assessed property tax base; and

payment amount for the principal of and interest on bonds that the municipality intends to apply in its mill rate calculation for the fiscal year corresponding to the tax year for which the assessment method selected by the municipality under this section will apply.

For purposes of this section, population shall be determined by the commissioner based on the latest statistics of the United States Bureau of the Census or on other reliable population data, and the commissioner shall advise each municipality of its population by January 15 of each year.

The percentage in (c) of this section is based on the total tax rate established by the municipality and levied each year under AS

43.56.010(b)

and is as follows:

If the tax rate determined under is: AS

43.56.010(b)

The percentage is: Not more than 18.0 mills 375 percent More than 18.0 mills but not more than 19.0 mills 300 percent More than 19.0 mills 225 percent

Click to view

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision requesting the governor to establish an advisory planning group under AS

44.19.145

to advise the governor on municipal involvement in a North Slope natural gas project and outlining duties and annual reporting requirements for that advisory planning group, including provision of recommendations for changes to this section related to the commercialization of natural gas that would facilitate development of a North Slope natural gas project and mitigate financial impacts to communities affect by a North Slope natural gas project, see sec. 74, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For population determination for municipal oil and gas production property, see 3 AAC 131.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (c), substituted “the percentage determined in (f) of this section” for “225 percent”; in (d), substituted “Each” for “By February 1 of each”, added “, by” at the end of the introductory language, added the (d)(1) designation and “February 1”, and added (d)(2); added (f), and made related and stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 78, ch. 14, SLA 2014 provides that (f) of this section and the 2014 amendments to (c) and (d) of this section “apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2014.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The military population of the state should be included in the total population for purposes of applying the property tax methodology described in this section. 1978 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 21, decided under former, similar law.

Section 43.56 property annexed to a municipality after the statutorily prescribed January 1, property assessment deadline, but before a municipality finalizes its tax roll, is taxable under this section and the tax paid to the municipality will be a credit against that oil company’s corporate state tax for that year under AS

43.56.010(d)

. March 1, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.45.090.
Tax limitation.

A municipality may not, during a year, levy an ad valorem tax for any purpose in excess of three percent of the assessed value of property in the municipality. All property on which an ad valorem tax is levied shall be taxed at the same rate during the year.

A municipality, or combination of municipalities occupying the same geographical area, in whole or in part, may not levy taxes

that will result in tax revenues from all sources exceeding $1,500 a year for each person residing within the municipal boundaries; or

on value that, when combined with the value of property otherwise taxable by the municipality, exceeds the product of the percentage determined in (e) of this section of the average per capita assessed full and true value of property in the state multiplied by the number of residents of the taxing municipality.

The commissioner shall apportion the lawful levy and equitably divide the tax revenues on the basis of need, services performed, and other considerations in the public interest if two or more municipalities occupying the same geographical area, in whole or in part, attempt to levy a tax

the combined levy of which would result in tax revenues from all sources exceeding $1,500 a year for each person residing within the municipal boundaries; or

on value that, when combined with the value of property otherwise taxable by the municipality, exceeds the product of the percentage determined in (e) of this section of the average per capita assessed full and true value of property in the state multiplied by the number of residents of the taxing municipality.

For the purpose of (b) and (c) of this section, population shall be determined by the commissioner based on the latest statistics of the United States Bureau of the Census or on other reliable population data.

The percentage in (b) and (c) of this section is based on the total tax rate established by the municipality and levied each year under AS

43.56.010(b)

and is as follows:

If the tax rate determined under AS

43.56.010(b)

is: The percentage is: Not more than 18.0 mills 375 percent More than 18.0 mills but not more than 19.0 mills 300 percent More than 19.0 mills 225 percent

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 1995; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(2) and (c)(2), substituted “the percentage determined in (e) of this section” for “225 percent”; added (e), and made related and stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 78, ch. 14, SLA 2014 provides that (e) of this section and the 2014 amendments to (b) and (c) of this section “apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2014.”

Sec. 29.45.100.
No limitations on taxes to pay bonds.

The limitations provided for in AS

29.45.080

—

29.45.090

do not apply to taxes levied or pledged to pay or secure the payment of the principal and interest on bonds. Taxes to pay or secure the payment of principal and interest on bonds may be levied without limitation as to rate or amount, regardless of whether the bonds are in default or in danger of default.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.101.
Limitation on taxation of fuel.

A municipality may not levy or collect a property tax under AS

29.45.010

or

29.45.055

on refined fuel unless the fuel has been physically loaded, unloaded, or stored in the municipality.

History.

(§ 3 ch 117 SLA 2003)

Sec. 29.45.103.
Taxation records.

Municipal records dealing with assessment, valuation, or taxation may be inspected by the state assessor or a designee.

If a municipality’s assessment and valuation has been done by a private contractor, records concerning the municipality’s valuation and assessment shall be made available to the state assessor or a designee on request.

Upon request, a record described in (a) or (b) of this section shall promptly be made available to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

or the child support enforcement agency of another state. If the record is prepared or maintained in an electronic data base, it may be supplied by providing the requesting agency with a copy of the electronic records and a statement certifying its contents. The agency receiving information under this subsection may use the information only for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 141 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 29.45.105.
Errors in taxation procedures.

If a municipality receives a notice from the state assessor that major errors have been found in its assessment, valuation, or taxation procedures, the municipality shall correct its procedures before the beginning of the next fiscal year or file an appeal under (b) of this section.

A municipality may appeal a notice from the state assessor that it has made a major error in assessment, valuation, or taxation procedures by filing an appeal with the commissioner within 30 days after receipt of notice of error.

The commissioner, after consulting with the Alaska Association of Assessing Officers, shall render a decision within 60 days after the receipt of a request under (b) of this section. If the commissioner determines that a major error has been made in assessment, valuation, or taxation procedures the commissioner shall notify the municipality of changes that must be made and the municipality shall correct its procedures before the beginning of the next fiscal year.

If errors in its assessment, valuation, or taxation procedures have resulted in a loss of revenue to the state, the municipality shall reimburse the state for the amount of revenues lost.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For errors in municipal assessment, valuation, or taxation records, see 3 AAC 139.

Sec. 29.45.110.
Full and true value.

The assessor shall assess property at its full and true value as of January 1 of the assessment year, except as provided in this section, AS

29.45.060

, and

29.45.230

. The full and true value is the estimated price that the property would bring in an open market and under the then prevailing market conditions in a sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer both conversant with the property and with prevailing general price levels.

Assessment of business inventories may be based on the average monthly method of assessment rather than the value existing on January 1. The method used to assess business inventories shall be prescribed by the governing body.

In the case of cessation of business during the tax year, the municipality may provide for reassessment of business inventories using the average monthly method of assessment for the tax year rather than the value existing on January 1 of the tax year, and for reduction and refund of taxes. In enacting an ordinance authorized by this section, the municipality may prescribe procedures, restrictions, and conditions of assessing or reassessing business inventories and of remitting or refunding taxes.

The provisions of this subsection apply to determine the full and true value of property that qualifies for a low-income housing credit under 26 U.S.C. 42:

when the assessor acts to determine the full and true value of property that qualifies for a low-income housing credit under 26 U.S.C. 42, instead of assessing the property under (a) of this section, the assessor shall base assessment of the value of the property on the actual income derived from the property and may not adjust it based on the amount of any federal income tax credit given for the property; for property the full and true value of which is to be determined under this paragraph, to secure an assessment under this subsection, an owner of property that qualifies for the low-income housing credit shall apply to the assessor before May 15 of each year in which the assessment is desired; the property owner shall submit the application on forms prescribed by the assessor and shall include information that may reasonably be required to determine the entitlement of the applicant;

the governing body of the municipality shall determine by ordinance whether the full and true value of all property within the municipality that first qualifies for a low-income housing credit under 26 U.S.C. 42 on and after January 1, 2001, shall be exempt from the requirement of assessment under (1) of this subsection; thereafter, for property that first qualifies for a low-income housing credit under 26 U.S.C. 42 on and after January 1, 2001, and that, by ordinance, is exempt from the requirement of mandatory assessment under (1) of this subsection, the governing body

may determine, by parcel, whether the property shall be assessed under (a) of this section or on the basis of actual income derived from the property without adjustment based on the amount of any federal income tax credit given for the property, as authorized by (1) of this subsection; and

may not, under (A) of this paragraph, change the manner of assessment of the parcel of property if debt relating to the property incurred in conjunction with the property’s qualifying for the low-income housing tax credit remains outstanding.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 2000)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Valuation of boats and vessels on the basis of registered or certified tonnage rather than full and true value does not limit the application of the full and true value as to boats and vessels. 1962 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 18, decided under former similar law.

Sec. 29.45.120.
Returns.

The municipality may require each person having ownership or control of or an interest in property to submit a return in the form prescribed by the assessor, based on property values of property subject to an ad valorem tax existing on January 1, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

The assessor may, by written notice, require a person to provide additional information within 30 days.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 40 SLA 1995)

Sec. 29.45.130.
Independent investigation.

The assessor is not bound to accept a return as correct. The assessor may make an independent investigation of property returned or of taxable property on which no return has been filed. In either case, the assessor may make the assessor’s own valuation of the property subject to an ad valorem tax and this valuation is prima facie evidence of the value of the property.

For investigation, the assessor or the assessor’s agent may enter real property during reasonable hours to examine visible personal property and the exterior of a dwelling or other structure on the real property. The assessor or the assessor’s agent may enter and examine the interior of a dwelling or other structure or the personal property in it only (1) if the structure is under construction and not yet occupied; (2) with the permission of a person in actual possession of the structure; or (3) in accordance with a court order to compel the entry and inspection. The assessor or the assessor’s agent may examine all property records involved. A person shall, on request, furnish to the assessor or the assessor’s agent assistance for the investigation and permit the assessor or the assessor’s agent to enter a dwelling or other structure to examine the structure or personal property in it during reasonable hours. The assessor may seek a court order to compel entry and production of records needed for assessment purposes.

An assessor may examine a person on oath. On request, the person shall submit to examination at a reasonable time and place selected by the assessor.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 40 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1999)

Sec. 29.45.140.
Violations; authorization to prescribe penalties by ordinance.

For knowingly failing to file a tax statement required by ordinance or knowingly making a false affidavit to a statement required by a tax ordinance relative to the amount, location, kind, or value of property subject to taxation with intent to evade the taxation, a municipality may by ordinance prescribe a penalty not to exceed a fine of $1,000 or imprisonment for 90 days.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.150.
Reevaluation.

A systematic reevaluation of taxable real and personal property undertaken by the assessor, whether of specific areas in which real property is located or of specific classes of real or personal property to be assessed, shall be made only in accordance with a resolution or other act of the municipality directing a systematic reevaluation of all taxable property in the municipality over the shortest period of time practicable, as fixed in the resolution or act.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.160.
Assessment roll.

The assessor shall prepare an annual assessment roll. The roll must contain

a description of all property subject to an ad valorem tax;

the assessed value of all property subject to an ad valorem tax;

the names and addresses of persons with property subject to an ad valorem tax.

The assessor may list real property by any description that may be made certain. Real property is assessed to the record owner. The district recorder shall at least monthly provide the assessor a copy of each recorded change of ownership showing the name and mailing address of the owner and the name and mailing address of the person recording the change of ownership. Other persons having an interest in the property may be listed on the assessment records with the owner. The person in whose name property is listed as owner is conclusively presumed to be the legal record owner. If the property owner is unknown, the property may be assessed to “unknown owner”. An assessment is not invalidated by a mistake, omission, or error in the name of the owner, if the property is correctly described.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 40 SLA 1995)

Sec. 29.45.170.
Assessment notice.

The assessor shall give each person named in the assessment roll a notice of assessment showing the assessed value of the person’s property that is subject to an ad valorem tax. On each notice is printed a brief summary of the dates when taxes are payable, delinquent, and subject to penalty and interest, and the dates when the board of equalization will sit.

Sufficient assessment notice is given if mailed by first class mail 30 days before the equalization hearings. If the address is not known to the assessor, the notice may be addressed to the person at the post office nearest the property. Notice is effective on the date of mailing.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 40 SLA 1995)

Sec. 29.45.180.
Corrections.

A person receiving an assessment notice shall advise the assessor of errors or omissions in the assessment of the person’s property. The assessor may correct errors or omissions in the roll before the board of equalization hearing.

If errors found in the preparation of the assessment roll are adjusted, the assessor shall mail a corrected notice allowing 30 days for appeal to the board of equalization.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.190.
Appeal.

A person whose name appears on the assessment roll or the agent or assigns of that person may appeal to the board of equalization for relief from an alleged error in valuation not adjusted by the assessor to the taxpayer’s satisfaction.

The appellant shall, within 30 days after the date of mailing of notice of assessment, submit to the assessor a written appeal specifying grounds in the form that the board of equalization may require. Otherwise, the right of appeal ceases unless the board of equalization finds that the taxpayer was unable to comply.

The assessor shall notify an appellant by mail of the time and place of hearing.

The assessor shall prepare for use by the board of equalization a summary of assessment data relating to each assessment that is appealed.

A city in a borough may appeal an assessment to the borough board of equalization in the same manner as a taxpayer. Within five days after receipt of the appeal, the assessor shall notify the person whose property assessment is being appealed by the city.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.200.
Board of equalization.

The governing body sits as a board of equalization for the purpose of hearing an appeal from a determination of the assessor, or it may delegate this authority to one or more boards appointed by it. An appointed board may be composed of not less than three persons, who shall be members of the governing body, municipal residents, or a combination of members of the governing body and residents. The governing body shall by ordinance establish the qualifications for membership.

The board of equalization is governed in its proceedings by rules adopted by ordinance that are consistent with general rules of administrative procedure. The board may alter an assessment of a lot only pursuant to an appeal filed as to the particular lot.

Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, a determination of the assessor as to whether property is taxable under law may be appealed directly to the superior court.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Opinions of attorney general. —

When the borough assembly functions as a board of equalization or adjustment, it acts as an administrative, not a legislative, body. 1965 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 7, decided under former, similar law.

Sec. 29.45.210.
Hearing.

If an appellant fails to appear, the board of equalization may proceed with the hearing in the absence of the appellant.

The appellant bears the burden of proof. The only grounds for adjustment of assessment are proof of unequal, excessive, improper, or under valuation based on facts that are stated in a valid written appeal or proven at the appeal hearing. If a valuation is found to be too low, the board of equalization may raise the assessment.

The board of equalization shall certify its actions to the assessor within seven days. Except as to supplementary assessments, the assessor shall enter the changes and certify the final assessment roll by June 1.

An appellant or the assessor may appeal a determination of the board of equalization to the superior court as provided by rules of court applicable to appeals from the decisions of administrative agencies. Appeals are heard on the record established at the hearing before the board of equalization.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.220.
Supplementary assessment rolls.

The assessor shall include property omitted from the assessment roll on a supplementary roll, using the procedures set out in this chapter for the original roll.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.230.
Tax adjustments on property affected by a disaster.

The municipality may by ordinance provide for assessment or reassessment and reduction of taxes for property destroyed, damaged, or otherwise reduced in value as a result of a disaster.

An assessment or reassessment under this section may be made by the assessor only upon the receipt of a sworn statement of the taxpayer that losses exceed $1,000. A reduction of taxes may be made only on losses in excess of $1,000 for the remainder of the year following the disaster. On reassessment, the municipality shall recompute this tax and refund taxes that have already been paid.

The municipality shall give notice of assessment or reassessment under this section and shall hold an equalization hearing as provided in this chapter, except that a notice of appeal must be filed with the board of equalization within 10 days after notice of assessment or reassessment is given to the person appealing. Otherwise, the right of appeal ceases unless the board finds that the taxpayer is unable to comply.

In an ordinance authorized by this section, the municipality shall establish criteria for the reduction of taxes on property damaged, destroyed, or otherwise reduced in value as a result of disaster, and may, consistent with this section, prescribe procedures, restrictions, and conditions for assessing or reassessing property and for remitting, refunding, or forgiving taxes.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 1 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 50 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 1 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective May 13, 2004, in subsection (a), inserted “by ordinance” and deleted “natural” preceding “disaster”; in subsection (d), substituted “an ordinance” for “enacting an ordinance or resolution,” inserted “shall establish criteria for the reduction of taxes on property damaged, destroyed, or otherwise reduced in value as a result of disaster, and,” and twice substituted “for” for “of”; and repealed subsection (e).

Sec. 29.45.240.
Establishment of levy and determination of rate.

The power granted to a municipality to assess, levy, and collect a property tax shall be exercised by means of an ordinance. The rate of levy, the date of equalization, and the date when taxes become delinquent shall be fixed by resolution.

A municipality shall annually determine the rate of levy before June 15. By July 1 the tax collector shall mail tax statements setting out the levy, dates when taxes are payable and delinquent, and penalties and interest.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.250.
Rates of penalty and interest.

A penalty not to exceed 20 percent of the tax due may be added to all delinquent taxes, and interest not to exceed 15 percent a year shall accrue upon all unpaid taxes, not including penalty, from the due date until paid in full. A municipality may impose a penalty not to exceed 20 percent of the tax due upon the late return of personal property assessment forms. A penalty under this section may be imposed according to a formula that increases the amount of the penalty as the length of time increases during which payment is delinquent or assessment forms are not returned.

If a taxpayer is given the right to pay the tax in two installments, penalty and interest on an unpaid installment accrues from the date the installment becomes due.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)